Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5933.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11. (1) The An enforcing agency shall examine an application for a building permit or an additional permit. If the application conforms to this act, the code, and the requirements of other applicable laws and ordinances, the enforcing agency shall approve the application and issue a building permit or an additional permit to the applicant, as applicable. An The enforcing agency shall grant the application, shall be granted, in whole or in part, or denied within deny the application not later than 10 business days , except that in case of after receipt of the application. However, if the application is for an unusually complicated building or structure, action the enforcing agency shall be taken within grant the application, in whole or in part, or deny the application not later than 15 business days after receipt of the application. Failure by an enforcing agency other than the department to grant, in whole or in part, or deny an application within these periods of time shall be deemed is considered to be a denial of the application for purposes of authorizing the institution of an appeal to the appropriate board of appeals. The (2) For an application for a building permit or an additional permit that an applicant submits to the department, if the department requires a change to the application, the department must notify the applicant within the periods of time described in subsection (1), as applicable. Except as otherwise provided under section 11a, the department shall not require any new or additional changes to the application for a building permit or an additional permit after those periods of time. (3) An enforcing agency shall approve changes in plans and specifications previously approved by it, the enforcing agency, if the changes require approval, and if the changed plans and specifications when so changed remain in conformity with law. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this act or the code, the construction or alteration of a building or structure shall must not be commenced commence until a building permit has been issued. The construction of a building or structure shall must comply with the approved application for a building permit, and the enforcing agency shall insure ensure such compliance in the manner provided in under section 12 and in any other way it the enforcing agency deems appropriate. (5) (2) The enforcing agency may suspend, revoke, or cancel a building permit in case of failure or neglect to comply with the provisions of this act or the code, or upon a finding by it the enforcing agency that a false statement or representation has been made in the application for the building permit. (6) As used in this section and sections 11a to 11c, "additional permit" means a permit for a particular kind of work as described in section 10(6). Additional permit includes, but is not limited to, all of the following permits: (a) An electrical permit. (b) A plumbing permit. (c) A mechanical or HVAC permit. (d) A demolition permit. (e) A foundation-only permit. (f) A temporary structure permit. (g) A shell building permit. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5932. (b) House Bill No. 5934. (c) House Bill No. 5935.